Washington statutes.
RCW 19.27.060

Local building regulations superseded—Exceptions.

(1) The governing bodies of counties and cities may amend the codes enumerated in RCW 19.27.031 as amended and adopted by the state building code council as they apply within their respective jurisdictions, but the amendments shall not result in a code that is less than the minimum performance standards and objectives contained in the state building code except as provided in subsection (2) of this section.

(a) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, no amendment to a code enumerated in RCW 19.27.031 as amended and adopted by the state building code council that affects single-family or multifamily residential buildings shall be effective unless the amendment is approved by the building code council under RCW 19.27.074(1)(b).

(b) Any county or city amendment to a code enumerated in RCW 19.27.031 which is approved under RCW 19.27.074(1)(b) shall continue to be effective after any action is taken under RCW 19.27.074(1)(a) without necessity of reapproval under RCW 19.27.074(1)(b) unless the amendment is declared null and void by the council at the time any action is taken under RCW 19.27.074(1)(a) because such action in any way altered the impact of the amendment.

(2) The legislative body of a county or city, in exercising the authority provided under subsection (1) of this section to amend the code enumerated in *RCW 19.27.031(1)(b), may adopt amendments that eliminate any minimum gross floor area requirement for single-family detached dwellings or that provide a minimum gross floor area requirement below the minimum performance standards and objectives contained in the state building code.

(3) Except as permitted or provided otherwise under this section, the state building code shall be applicable to all buildings and structures including those owned by the state or by any governmental subdivision or unit of local government.

(4) The governing body of each county or city may limit the application of any portion of the state building code to exclude specified classes or types of buildings or structures according to use other than single-family or multifamily residential buildings. However, in no event shall fruits or vegetables of the tree or vine stored in buildings or warehouses constitute combustible stock for the purposes of application of the uniform fire code. A governing body of a county or city may inspect facilities used for temporary storage and processing of agricultural commodities.

(5) No provision of the uniform fire code concerning roadways shall be part of the state building code: PROVIDED, That this subsection shall not limit the authority of a county or city to adopt street, road, or access standards.

(6) The provisions of the state building code may be preempted by any city or county to the extent that the code provisions relating to the installation or use of sprinklers in jail cells conflict with the secure and humane operation of jails.

(7)(a) Effective one year after July 23, 1989, the governing bodies of counties and cities may adopt an ordinance or resolution to exempt from permit requirements certain construction or alteration of either group R, division 3, or group M, division 1 occupancies, or both, as defined in the uniform building code, 1988 edition, for which the total cost of fair market value of the construction or alteration does not exceed fifteen hundred dollars. The permit exemption shall not otherwise exempt the construction or alteration from the substantive standards of the codes enumerated in RCW 19.27.031, as amended and maintained by the state building code council under RCW 19.27.070.

(b) Prior to July 23, 1989, the state building code council shall adopt by rule, guidelines exempting from permit requirements certain construction and alteration activities under (a) of this subsection.

[ 2018 c 302 s 2; 2015 c 226 s 1; 2002 c 135 s 1. Prior: 1989 c 266 s 2; 1989 c 246 s 1; 1987 c 462 s 12; 1986 c 118 s 15; 1985 c 360 s 10; 1981 2nd ex.s. c 12 s 5; 1980 c 64 s 1; 1975 1st ex.s. c 282 s 2; 1974 ex.s. c 96 s 6.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 19.27.031 was amended by 2024 c 170 s 1, changing subsection (1)(b) to subsection (1)(a)(ii).

Effective dates—1987 c 462: See note following RCW 13.04.116.